Hawaii statutes.
§431:20-102 Definitions. For the
purposes of this article:

(1) Controlled escrow company means each person
engaged in the business of handling escrows of real property transactions in
connection with which title policies are issued by a title insurer, which
person:

(A) If an artificial person, directly or
indirectly, is controlled by or controls, or is under common control with a
title insurer, or is controlled by or controls, or is under common control with
an underwritten title company; or

(B) If a natural person, is employed by or
controlled by a title insurer, or by an underwritten title company.

(2) Title insurance business or business of title
insurance means:

(A) Issuing as insurer or offering to issue as
insurer a title insurance policy; or

(B) Transacting or proposing to transact by a
title insurer any of the following activities when conducted or performed in
contemplation of the issuance of a title insurance policy:

(i) Soliciting or negotiating the issuance of a
title insurance policy;

(ii) Guaranteeing, warranting or otherwise
insuring the correctness of title searches;

(iii) Handling of escrows, settlements or
closings;

(iv) Execution of title insurance policies;

(v) Effecting contracts of reinsurance;

(vi) Abstracting, searching or examining titles;
or

(vii) Doing or proposing to do any business in
substance equivalent to any of the foregoing in a manner designed to evade the
provisions of this article.

(3) Title insurance policy or policy means a contract
issuing or indemnifying against loss or damage arising from any or all of the
following existing on or before the policy date:

(A) Defects in, liens against, or encumbrances
on the insured title;

(B) Unmarketability of the insured title; or

(C) Invalidity or unenforceability of liens or
encumbrances on the stated property. Title insurance policy does not include a
preliminary report, binder, commitment, or abstract.

(4) Title insurer or insurer means a company
organized under laws of this State for the purpose of transacting as insurer
the business of title insurance, and any foreign or alien title insurer engaged
in this State in the business of title insurance as insurer.

(5) Underwritten title company means each person
engaged in the business of preparing lien or title searches, title
examinations, certificates of searches of title, or abstracts of title upon the
basis of which a title insurer regularly writes title policies. [L 1987, c 347,
pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next